New York, session 2025-2026, S3536.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (n) and (o) of subdivision 3 of section 265.01-e 2 of the penal law, paragraph (n) as amended and paragraph (o) as added by 3 section 1 of part F of chapter 55 of the laws of 2023, are amended and a 4 new paragraph (p) is added to read as follows: 5 (n) persons while participating in military ceremonies, funerals, and 6 honor guards; [or] 7 (o) persons while lawfully engaging in learning, practicing, training 8 for, competing in, or travelling into or within the state to learn, 9 practice, train for, or compete in, the sport of biathlon, in accordance 10 with all applicable local, state, and federal laws, rules, and regu- 11 lations[.]; or 12 (p) persons who are judges, justices or support magistrates of any 13 town or village justice court or of any court of the unified court 14 system and who are duly licensed to possess a pistol or revolver pursu- 15 ant to section 400.00 of this chapter. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08014-01-5